Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Products Containing Alcohol

244.650.
Sale of confections or candies containing alcohol — Sales to minors prohibited — Labeling required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the statutes, confections or candies having a liquid filling or liquid center and containing more than one-half percent (0.5%) but not more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by volume or weight may be sold at premises whether or not licensed under the provisions of KRS

243.030

and

243.040

.

No confection or candy described in this section shall be sold, given or delivered to any person under twenty-one (21) years of age. Any violation of this section shall be considered an unlawful transaction with a minor in the third degree pursuant to KRS

530.070

.

No confection or candy described in this section shall be sold or offered for sale in this state unless the product has a prominently displayed label containing the statement: “SALE OF THIS PRODUCT TO PERSONS UNDER 21 YEARS OF AGE IS UNLAWFUL.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 433, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

244.652.
Prohibition of possession, sale, or use of powdered or crystalline alcoholic beverage products.

No person shall possess, sell, offer for sale, or use any powdered or crystalline alcoholic beverage product.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 80, § 28, effective July 15, 2016.